Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 13
CONTESTS

31-10-1301. Who may contest - causes.

The election of any person declared duly elected to any municipal office may be contested by any registered elector of such municipality:

When the contestee is not eligible for the office to which he has been declared elected;

When illegal votes have been received or legal votes rejected at the polls in sufficient numbers to change the results;

For any error or mistake on the part of any of the judges of election or the clerk and his assistant in counting or declaring the result of the election if the error or mistake would be sufficient to change the result;

For malconduct, fraud, or corruption on the part of the judges of election in any precinct or any clerk or his assistant if the malconduct, fraud, or corruption would be sufficient to change the result;

For any other cause which shows that another was the legally elected person.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1067, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

IP(1) amended, p. 331, § 94, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1101 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1302. District judge to preside - bond.

All contested election cases of municipal officers shall be tried and determined in the district court of the county in which the municipality is located. Where a municipality is located in more than one county, the district court of either county has jurisdiction. The style and form of process, the manner of service of process and papers, the fees of officers, and judgment for costs and execution thereon shall be according to the rules and practices of the district court.

Before the district court is required to take jurisdiction of the contest, the contestor must file with the clerk of said court a bond, with sureties, to be approved by the district judge, running to said contestee and conditioned to pay all costs in case of failure to maintain his contest.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1067, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1102 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1303. Filing statement - contents.

The contestor shall file in the office of the clerk of the district court, within ten days after the expiration of the period within which a recount may be requested pursuant to section 31-10-1207 (2), or within ten days after the conclusion of a recount conducted pursuant to section 31-10-1207, whichever is later, a written statement of the contestor's intention to contest the election, setting forth the name of the contestor, that the contestor is a registered elector of the municipality, the name of the contestee, the office contested, the time of election, and the particular causes of the contest. The statement shall be verified by the affidavit of the contestor or some registered elector of the municipality that the causes set forth in such statement are true to the best of the affiant's knowledge and belief.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1067, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 332, § 95, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 799, § 20, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1103 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1304. Summons - answer.

The clerk of the district court shall thereupon issue a summons in the ordinary form, in which the contestor shall be named as plaintiff and the contestee as defendant, stating the court in which the action is brought and a brief statement of the causes of contest, as set forth in the contestor's statement. The summons shall be served upon the contestee in the same manner as other summonses are served out of the district court of this state.

The contestee, within ten days after the service of such summons, shall make and file his answer to the same with the clerk of said court in which he shall either admit or specifically deny each allegation intended to be controverted by the contestee on the trial of such contest and shall set up in such answer any counterstatement which he relies upon as entitling him to the office to which he has been declared elected.

When the reception of illegal votes or the rejection of legal votes is alleged as the cause of the contest, a list of the number of persons who so voted or offered to vote shall be set forth in the statement of contestor and shall be likewise set forth in the answer of contestee if any such cause is alleged in his answer by way of counterstatement.

When the answer of the contestee contains new matter constituting a counterstatement, the contestor, within ten days after the filing of such answer, shall reply to the same, admitting or specifically denying, under oath, each allegation contained in such counterstatement intended by him to be controverted on the trial, and file the same in the office of the clerk of the district court.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1067, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1104 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1305. Trial and appeals.

Immediately after the joining of issue, the district court shall fix a day for the trial to commence, not more than twenty days nor less than ten days after the joining of issue. Such trial shall take precedence over all other business in said court. The testimony may be oral or by depositions taken before any officer authorized to take depositions. Any depositions taken to be used upon the trial of such contest may be taken upon four days' notice thereof. The district judge shall cause the testimony to be taken in full and filed in said cause. The trial of such causes shall be conducted according to the rules and practice of the district court in other cases. Such proceedings may be reviewed and finally adjudicated by the supreme court of this state if application to such court is made by either party and if the supreme court is willing to assume jurisdiction of the case.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1068, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1105 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1306. Recount.

If, upon the trial of any contested election under this article, the statement or counterstatement sets forth an error in canvass sufficient to change the result, the trial judge has the power to conduct a recount of the ballots cast or the votes tabulated on the voting machines in the precinct where the alleged error was made. The court may also require the production before it of such witnesses, documents, records, and other evidence as may have or may contain information regarding the legality of any vote cast or counted for either of the contesting candidates or the correct number of votes cast for either candidate and may correct the canvass in accordance with the evidence presented and its findings thereon.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1068, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1106 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1307. Judgment.

The court shall pronounce judgment whether the contestee or any other person was duly elected. The person so declared elected is entitled to the office upon qualification. If the judgment is against the contestee and he has received his certificate, the judgment annuls it. If the court finds that no person was duly elected, the judgment shall be that the election be set aside and that a vacancy exists.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1068, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1107 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1308. Ballot questions and ballot issues - how contested.

The results of an election on any ballot question may be contested in the manner provided by this part 13. The grounds for such contest shall be those grounds set forth in section 31-10-1301 (1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d). The contestee shall be the appropriate election official. In addition to other matters required to be set forth by this part 13, the statement of intention to contest the election shall set forth the question contested.

Any contest arising out of a ballot issue or ballot question, as defined in section 1-1-104 (2.3) and (2.7), C.R.S., concerning the order on the ballot or concerning whether the form or content of any ballot title meets the requirements of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, shall be conducted as provided in section 1-11-203.5, C.R.S.

The result of an election on any ballot issue, as defined in section 1-1-104 (2.3), C.R.S., approving the creation of any debt or other financial obligation may be contested in the manner provided by this part 13. The grounds for such contest shall be those grounds set forth in sections 1-11-201 (4), C.R.S., and 31-10-1301 (1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d). The contestee shall be the municipality for which the ballot issue was decided.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1507, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1192, § 94, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 799, § 21, effective August 2.

L. 2003:

(3) added, p. 750, § 7, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1108 as it existed prior to 1975.